Tennessee, session 114, HB0480.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 66, Chapter 5, Part 1, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
The description of real property contained within a deed of conveyance of a
property not previously described in a recorded instrument must be prepared by a land
surveyor, as defined in § 62-18-102, who is registered pursuant to § 62-18-101. This
section does not apply to any deed of conveyance prepared by or for a governmental
department or agency.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB0480
000378
- 1 -